src-fst-affixes-verbs.lexc.md
* :%^VOWRaise ACT_IND_PRS_SG3_ZERO ;  (5) RAISED juu süü
*  ACT-IND-PRS-PL3_vAq ;  (6) joovaq sööväq

*  Harm-Neutr_77JUUMA/SUEUEMAE-PSS-IND-PRT_di ;  only 3rd person

* LEXICON V_77JUUMA/SUEUEMAE_NOT-RAISED-VOWEL  joo- söö-
*  ACT-PRFPRC_nUq-SG-NOM ;  joonuq

* LEXICON V_77JUUMA/SUEUEMAE_RAISED-VOWEL-TENSE  juvv
*  Harm-Neutr_INF_Aq ;  juvvaq süvväq
* :%>%{aä%} Harm-Neutr_JUVVA_PSS-IND-PRS ;  juvva süvvä
* :%>i Harm-Neutr_JUVVA_PSS-IND-PRT-1/2 ;  juvvi süvvi

* LEXICON V_77JUUMA/SUEUEMAE_NON-RAISED-VOWEL-TENSE  jõi-

* **LEXICON V_77KAEUEMAE** käümä:käü
* Yaml: **sueuemae**

* **LEXICON V_77XX/KAEUEMAE** käümä:käü

* :%^VOWRaise V_77JUUMA/SUEUEMAE_RAISED-VOWEL ;  (1) käü

*  V_77JUUMA/SUEUEMAE_NOT-RAISED-VOWEL ;  (2) käü-

* :%^VowRM%>vv V_77JUUMA/SUEUEMAE_RAISED-VOWEL-TENSE ;  (3) kävv

* :%^VowRM%>ve V_77JUUMA/SUEUEMAE_NON-RAISED-VOWEL-TENSE ;  (4) käve

*  ACT_IND_PRS_SG3_ZERO ;  (5) RAISED käü

*  ACT-IND-PRS-PL3_vAq ;  (6) käüväq

* **LEXICON V_78VWIMA** võima:või
* Yaml: **V-vwima**
* **LEXICON V_VWIMA/XX** võima:või

* Yaml: **saama**

* Yaml: __V-viimae__

* **LEXICON V_78MINEMAE** minemä:min
* Yaml: **V-minemae**
* **LEXICON V_XX/MINEMAE** minemä:min

Remainder is in exceptions.lexc

* **LEXICON V_79TULWMA** tulõma:tul
* Yaml: **tulwma**
* **LEXICON V_79TULWMA/XX** tulõma:tul

Retain consonant and stem vowel

* :l Harm-Neutr_INF_Aq ;  (2) tullaq
* :l%>%{eõ%} Harm-Neutr_ACT_PRSPRC_SG_NOM_v ;  (2b) tullõv
Act+PrsPrc+Sg+Nom

* **LEXICON V_79PURWMA** purõma:pur
* Yaml: **purwma**
* **LEXICON V_79PURWMA/XX** purõma:pur
Retain consonant 
*  Harm-Neutr_LUGWMA_PSS-PRC ;  (4) pur
Pss+PrfPrc, Pss+PrsPrc, 

Retain consonant and stem vowel
* :%{eõ%} Harm-Neutr_ACT-PRSPRC_v_LUGWMA ;  (1) purõma
+Act+PrsPrc+Sg OBL, Inf/mA, 
+Jus, 

Strengthen consonant
* :%^StrGStem Harm-Neutr_INF_Aq ;  (2) purraq
Inf 
Strengthen consonant 
* :%^StrGStem%>%{eõ%} Harm-Neutr_ACT_PRSPRC_SG_NOM_v ;  (2b) purrõv
Act+PrsPrc+Sg+Nom

Retain consonant and stem vowel
*  Harm-Neutr_ACT-PRFPRC_v_LUGWMA ;  (3) purnuq
+Act+PrfPrc

Retain consonant and add õ
* :%{eõ%} Harm-Neutr_LUGWMA_IND-CONNEGII ;  (5) purõ
Act+Ind+Prs+Sg1/Sg2/Pl1/Pl2, Ind+ConNegII, Ind+Prs+ConNeg
Pss+Ind

Retain consonant and stem vowel
* :%{eõ%} ACT_IND_PRS_SG3_ZERO/PL3_vAq ;  (6) purõma
Ind+Prs+ 3

Strengthen consonant and replace stem vowel with i
* :%>i TULWMA_ACT-IND-PRT-SG1 ;  (7) puri
Act+Ind+PrtSg1/Sg2/Pl1-3

consonant and add i
* :%>i Harm-Neutr_LUGWMA_IND-PRT-SG3 ;  (8) puri
Act+Ind+Prt+Sg3

* **LEXICON V_79OLWMA** olõma:o

* **LEXICON V_79OLWMA/XX** olõma:o

* **LEXICON V_80RAPAHUTMA** rapahutma:rapahuta
* **LEXICON V_80HAEMMAEHUETMAE** hämmähütmä:hämmähütä

* LEXICON V_80RAPAHUTMA/HAEMMAEHUETMAE  rapahutma:rapahuta

Retain consonant and stem vowel
* :t Harm-Neutr_ACT-PRSPRC_v_LUGWMA ;  (1) rapahutma
+Act+PrsPrc+Sg OBL, Inf/mA, 
+Jus, 

Strengthen consonant
* :t%>%{aä%} Harm-Neutr_INF_ZEROq ;  (2) rapahutaq
Inf 
Strengthen consonant 
* :t Harm-Neutr_ACT_PRSPRC_SG_NOM_vA ;  (2b) rapahutva
Act+PrsPrc+Sg+Nom

Retain consonant and stem vowel
* :t Harm-Neutr_ACT-PRFPRC_v_LUGWMA ;  (3) rapahutnuq
+Act+PrfPrc

Retain consonant 
* :d%>%{eõ%} Harm-Neutr_LUGWMA_PSS-PRC ;  (4) rapahudõ
Pss+PrfPrc, Pss+PrsPrc, 

Retain consonant and add õ
* :d%>%{aä%} Harm-Neutr_LUGWMA_IND-CONNEGII ;  (5) rapahuda

Act+Ind+Prs+Sg1/Sg2/Pl1/Pl2, Ind+ConNegII, Ind+Prs+ConNeg
Pss+Ind

Retain consonant and stem vowel
* :t ACT_IND_PRS_SG3_ZERO/PL3_vAq ;  (6) rapahut
Ind+Prs+ 3

Strengthen consonant and replace stem vowel with i
* :d%^VowRM%>i TULWMA_ACT-IND-PRT-SG1 ;  (7) rapahudi
Act+Ind+PrtSg1/Sg2/Pl1-3

Strengthen consonant and add ʼ
* : ACT_IND_PRT_SG3_t-PAL ;  (8) rapahut́ and error rapahut
Act+Ind+Prt+Sg3

* **LEXICON V_81TEGEMAE** tegemä:t
* Yaml: **tegemä**
Work
* **LEXICON V_81XX/TEGEMAE** tegemä:t

*tegemä examples:*
* *tegemä:* `tegemä+V+Inf/mA` (Eng. # (1))
* *tetäq:* `tegemä+V+Inf` (Eng. # (2))
* *tennüq:* `tegemä+V+Act+PrfPrc` (Eng. # (3))
* *tett:* `tegemä+V+Pss+PrfPrc` (Eng. # (4))
* *tii:* `tegemä+V+Act+Ind+Prs+Sg1` (Eng. # (5))
* *tiit:* `tegemä+V+Act+Ind+Prs+Sg2` (Eng. # (5))
* *tege:* `tegemä+V+Act+Ind+Prs+Sg3` (Eng. # (6))
* *teemiq:* `tegemä+V+Act+Ind+Prs+Pl1` (Eng. # (?5)!!)
* *tiitiq:* `tegemä+V+Act+Ind+Prs+Pl2` (Eng. # (5))
* *tegeväq:* `tegemä+V+Act+Ind+Prs+Pl3` (Eng. # (?6)!!)
* *tiiq:* `tegemä+V+Act+Ind+ConNegI` (Eng. # ()!!)
* *tii:* `tegemä+V+Act+Ind+ConNegII` (Eng. # ()!!)
* *tei:* `tegemä+V+Act+Ind+Prt+Sg1` (Eng. # (7))
* *teit:* `tegemä+V+Act+Ind+Prt+Sg2` (Eng. # (7))
* *tekḱ:* `tegemä+V+Act+Ind+Prt+Sg3` (Eng. # (8))
* *teimiq:* `tegemä+V+Act+Ind+Prt+Pl1` (Eng. # (7))
* *teitiq:* `tegemä+V+Act+Ind+Prt+Pl2` (Eng. # (7))
* *teiq:* `tegemä+V+Act+Ind+Prt+Pl3` (Eng. # (7))
* *tetä:* `tegemä+V+Pss+Ind+Prs+Sg1` (Eng. # (?4)!!)
* *tetäs:* `tegemä+V+Pss+Ind+Prs+Sg3` (Eng. # (?4)!!)
* *tettäv:* `tegemä+V+Pss+PrsPrc+Sg+Nom` (Eng. # (4))
* *tekuq:* `tegemä+V+Jus` (Eng. # (9))

* **LEXICON V_81NAEGEMAE** nägemä:täg
* Yaml: **nägemä**
Work
* **LEXICON V_81XX/NAEGEMAE** nägemä:te%{kØ%}%{ḱgØ%}

*nägemä examples:*
* *nägemä:* `nägemä+V+Inf/mA` (Eng. # (1))
* *nätäq:* `nägemä+V+Inf` (Eng. # (2))
* *nännüq:* `nägemä+V+Act+PrfPrc` (Eng. # (3))
* *nätt:* `nägemä+V+Pss+PrfPrc` (Eng. # (4))
* *näi:* `nägemä+V+Act+Ind+Prs+Sg1` (Eng. # (5))
* *näit:* `nägemä+V+Act+Ind+Prs+Sg2` (Eng. # (5))
* *näge:* `nägemä+V+Act+Ind+Prs+Sg3` (Eng. # (6))
* *näemiq:* `nägemä+V+Act+Ind+Prs+Pl1` (Eng. # (?5)!!)
* *näitiq:* `nägemä+V+Act+Ind+Prs+Pl2` (Eng. # (5))
* *nägeväq:* `nägemä+V+Act+Ind+Prs+Pl3` (Eng. # (?6)!!)
* *näiq:* `nägemä+V+Act+Ind+ConNegI` (Eng. # ()!!)
* *näi:* `nägemä+V+Act+Ind+ConNegII` (Eng. # ()!!)
* *näi:* `nägemä+V+Act+Ind+Prt+Sg1` (Eng. # (7))
* *näit:* `nägemä+V+Act+Ind+Prt+Sg2` (Eng. # (7))
* *näkḱ:* `nägemä+V+Act+Ind+Prt+Sg3` (Eng. # (8))
* *näimiq:* `nägemä+V+Act+Ind+Prt+Pl1` (Eng. # (7))
* *näitiq:* `nägemä+V+Act+Ind+Prt+Pl2` (Eng. # (7))
* *näiq:* `nägemä+V+Act+Ind+Prt+Pl3` (Eng. # (7))
* *nätä:* `nägemä+V+Pss+Ind+Prs+Sg1` (Eng. # (?4)!!)
* *nätäs:* `nägemä+V+Pss+Ind+Prs+Sg3` (Eng. # (?4)!!)
* *nättäv:* `nägemä+V+Pss+PrsPrc+Sg+Nom` (Eng. # (4))
* *näkuq:* `nägemä+V+Jus` (Eng. # (9))

* **LEXICON V_82ANDMA** andma:and
* Yaml: **andma**
* **LEXICON V_82PUEUEDMAE** püüdmä:püüd
* Yaml: **pueuedmae**

* **LEXICON V_82ANDMA/PUEUEDMAE** andma:%{ˋØ%}an%{dd́n%}

* LEXICON V_83NÕSTMA   nõstma:nõst
gradation: no
* Yaml: **nwstma**
* LEXICON V_83PÄSTMÄ   nõstma:nõst
gradation: no
* Yaml: **nwstma**

* LEXICON V_83NÕSTMA/PÄSTMÄ   nõstma:nõst

* LEXICON V_83SÕITMA   sõitma:sõit
gradation: yes
* Yaml: **switma**
* LEXICON V_83HEITMAE   heitmä:heit
gradation: yes
* Yaml: **heitmae**

* LEXICON V_83SÕITMA/HEITMAE   sõitma:sõi%{tt́d%}a

IS THIS RIGHT? 2015-09-02

sõida

* LEXICON V_83LAULMA   laulma:laul
gradation: yes
* Yaml: **switma**

* LEXICON V_83LAULMA/XX   laulma:lau%{lĺ%}

HERE is the distinction 2016-10-04

IS THIS RIGHT? 2015-09-02

* LEXICON V_83ATMA   atma:atta
gradation: yes
* Yaml: **switma**

* LEXICON V_83ATMA/XX   atma:a%{tØ%}%{tt́%}

IS THIS RIGHT? 2015-09-02

* LEXICON V_83SUTMA   atma:a%{tØ%}%{tt́%}a
gradation: yes
* Yaml: **switma**
* LEXICON V_83PETMÄ   petmä:pe%{tØ%}%{tt́%}ä
gradation: G3, G4
* Yaml: **heitmae**

* LEXICON V_83SUTMA/PETMÄ   sutma:su%{tØ%}%{tt́%}a

IS THIS RIGHT? 2015-09-02

sõida

* LEXICON V_83VWTMA   võtma:võ%{tØ%}%{tt́Ø%}a
gradation: G3, G4, G1
* Yaml: **vwtma**

* LEXICON V_83VWTMA/XX   võtma:võ%{tØ%}%{tt́Ø%}a

IS THIS RIGHT? 2015-09-02

sõida

* LEXICON V_84LASKMA  laskma:lask
* Yaml: **nwstma**
* LEXICON V_84KÄSKMÄ  käskmä:käsk
* Yaml: **nwstma**
* LEXICON V_84LASKMA/KÄSKMÄ  laskma:las%{kḱØ%}
* Yaml: **nwstma**

* **LEXICON V_85HIRNMA** kakma:kaku hirnma:hirnu
* Yaml: **kakma**
* **LEXICON V_85TUEMPSMAE** kakma:kaku hirnma:hirnu
* Yaml: **kakma**
* **LEXICON V_85HIRNMA/TUEMPSMAE** kakma:kaku hirnma:hirnu

* **LEXICON V_85HAUDMA**  kakma:%{ˋØ%}ka%{kØ%}%{kḱ%}u 
* Yaml: **haudma**
* **LEXICON V_85VAELKMAE**  haudma:haud
* Yaml: **vaelkmae**
* **LEXICON V_85HAUDMA/VAELKMAE** kakma:kakk haudma:haud

* **LEXICON V_85KAKMA**  kakma:%{ˋØ%}ka%{kØ%}%{kḱ%}u 
* Yaml: **haudma**
* **LEXICON V_85TRUEKMAE**  trükmä:trü%{kØ%}%{kḱ%}ü
* Yaml: **vaelkmae**
* **LEXICON V_85KAKMA/TRUEKMAE** kakma:kakk

* **LEXICON V_86ISTMA** istma:istu
* Yaml: **istma**
* **LEXICON V_86ISTMA/XX** istma:istu

* **LEXICON V_86PUTMA** istma:istu
* Yaml: **istma**
* **LEXICON V_86PUTMA/XX** istma:istu

* **LEXICON V_86JAHTJMA** jaht́ma:ˋjah%{tØ%}i
* Yaml: **jahtjma**
* **LEXICON V_86EHTJMÄ** eht́mä:ehti
* Yaml: **V-ehtjmae**

* **LEXICON V_86JAHTJMA/EHTJMÄ** eht́mä:eh%{tt́%}

* **LEXICON V_86TOL1MA** jaht́ma:ˋjah%{tØ%}i
* Yaml: **jahtjma**
* **LEXICON V_86TIK1MÄ** eht́mä:ehti
* Yaml: **V-ehtjmae**

* **LEXICON V_86TOL1MA/TIK1MÄ** eht́mä:eh%{tt́%}

* **LEXICON V_87KOSIMA** kosima:ko%{sØ%}si
* Yaml: **V-kosima**
* **LEXICON V_87KERIMAE** kerimä:keri
* Yaml: **V-kerimae**

* **LEXICON V_87KOSIMA/KERIMAE** kosima:kosi

* LEXICON V_88SIBAHAMA  sibama:siba
* Yaml: **V-sibama88,sibahama**
* Yaml: **V-juevaemae88**
* LEXICON V_88SIBAHAMA/JUEVAEHAEMAE  sibama:siba

### SETS BY CONSONANT QUALITY

* : Harm-Neutr_ACT_IND_PRS_SG2_USUALLY-STRONG ;  kaota
+Act+Ind+Prs+Sg2, +Use/NG+Err/Orth+Act+Ind+Prs+Sg2, 
+Act+Ind+Prs+Pl1, +Act+Ind+Prs+Pl2

* : ACT_IND_PRS_3_s/sEq ;  
+Act+Ind+Prs+Sg3, +Act+Ind+Prs+Pl3

### INDICATIVE PRESENT SUBJECT CONJUGATION

* +Ind+Prs+Neg:%-%{XV%}iq K ;  This gives stress
* +Err/Orth-no-q+Use/NG+Ind+Prs+Neg:%-iq K ;  This gives stress
* +Err/Orth-no-q+Use/NG+Ind+Prs+Neg:%-%{XV%}i K ;  more neutral without q
* +Err/Orth-no-q+Use/NG+Ind+Prs+Neg:%-i K ;  more neutral without q

### JUS
* LEXICON MUTUAL_JUS_guq  regardless of harmony this is back 

CHECK THIS

### PASSIVE INDICATIVE PRESENT CONJUGATION

* LEXICON Harm-Neutr_JUVVA_PSS-IND-PRS  juvva süvvä

* LEXICON Harm-Neutr_JUVVA_PSS-IND-PRT-1/2  juvvi süvvi

### INDICATIVE PRETERIT SUBJECT CONJUGATION

### PASSIVE INDICATIVE PRETERIT CONJUGATION

* +Use/NG+Err/Orth-no-q+Pss+PrfPrc+Pl+Nom:%>tt%{uü%} K ;  no q
* +Use/NG+Err/Orth-no-q+Pss+PrfPrc+Pl+Nom:%>t%{uü%} K ;  no q
* +Use/NG+Err/Orth-no-q+Pss+PrfPrc+Pl+Nom:%>d%{uü%} K ;  no q

### NON-FINITES

* +Use/NG+Err/Orth-no-q+Inf:%>d%{aä%} K ;  no q

* +Use/NG+Err/Orth-no-q+Inf:%>i%{aä%} K ;  no q

* +Use/NG+Err/Orth-no-q+Inf:%>%{aä%} K ;  no q

* +Use/NG+Err/Orth-no-q+Inf:%>t%{aä%} K ;  no q

* +Use/NG+Err/Orth-no-q+Inf: K ;  no q

* **+Der/JA+N:%>j NMN_9KIPWN1/ELLAEI ;** This should have a +Der/JA tag

* +Use/NG+Err/Orth+Act+PrsPrc+Pl+Nom:%>v%{aä%} K ;  no q

* +Use/NG+Err/Orth+Act+PrsPrc+Pl+Nom:%>v%{aä%} K ;  no q

* LEXICON ACT-PRFPRC-OBL_nU  only oblique cases and Pl+Nom
* +Use/NG+Err/Orth+Act+PrfPrc+Pl+Nom:%>n%{uü%} K ;  no q

* +Use/NG+Err/Orth+Act+PrfPrc:%^WGStem%>n%{uü%} K ;  no q

PASSIVE DISTRIBUTION
* Harm-Neutr_NÕSTMA-PSS-IND-PRS_dA ;  +Pss+Ind+Prs+Sg1: sõidõda
* Harm-Neutr_KAOTAMA-PSS_PRFPRC_t ;  +Pss+PrfPrc+Sg+Nom: kaotõt

* +Use/NG+Err/Orth+Pss+Ind+Prt+Sg2:%>di K ;  no q
* +Use/NG+Err/Orth+Pss+Ind+Prt+Sg2:%>did%{eõ%} K ;  no q
* +Use/NG+Err/Orth+Pss+Ind+Prt+Pl1:%>dimi K ;  no q
* +Use/NG+Err/Orth+Pss+Ind+Prt+Pl2:%>diti K ;  no q
* +Use/NG+Err/Orth+Pss+Ind+Prt+Pl3:%>di K ;  no q
* +Use/NG+Err/Orth+Pss+Ind+Prt+Pl3:%>div%{aä%} K ;  no q

* Harm-Neutr_V0_PSS_PRSPRC_dAv ;  +Pss+PrsPrc+Sg+Nom: kaotõdav
* Harm-Neutr_KAOTAMA-PSS_PRFPRC_t ;  +Pss+PrfPrc+Sg+Nom: kaotõt

* +Use/NG+Err/Orth+Pss+Ind+Prs+Sg2:%>t%{aä%}d%{eõ%} K ;  no q
* +Use/NG+Err/Orth+Pss+Ind+Prs+Pl1:%>t%{aä%}mi K ;  no q
* +Use/NG+Err/Orth+Pss+Ind+Prs+Pl2:%>t%{aä%}ti K ;  no q
* +Use/NG+Err/Orth+Pss+Ind+Prs+Pl3:%>t%{aä%}s%{eõ%} K ;  no q

* +Use/NG+Err/Orth-no-q+Pss+PrsPrc+Pl+Nom:%>t%{aä%}%>v%{aä%} K ;  no q

* +Use/NG+Err/Orth-no-q+Pss+PrsPrc+Pl+Nom:%>d%{aä%}%>v%{aä%} K ;  no q

* +Use/NG+Err/Orth-no-q+Pss+PrsPrc+Pl+Nom:%>tt%{aä%}%>v%{aä%} K ;  no q

* +Use/NG+Err/Orth-no-q+Pss+PrsPrc+Pl+Nom:%>d%{aä%}%>v%{aä%} K ;  no q

* +Use/NG+Err/Orth+Pss+PrfPrc+Sg+Nom:%>d%{uü%} K ; 

* +Use/NG+Err/Orth-no-q+Pl+Nom:%>d%{uü%} K ;  no q
